it: Design Frame della bicicletta: A diamante; Fat bike; Pieghevole; Cargo longtail; Step-through; Triciclo; Altro
lt-LT: Dviračio rėmo konstrukcija: Deimantinis; „Fatbike“ (plačioms padangoms); Sulankstomas; Krovininis prailgintas; Žemu rėmu („Step-through“); Triratis; Kita
th: การออกแบบเฟรมจักรยาน: ทรงเพชร; แฟตไบค์; พับได้; คาร์โก้หางยาว; ทรงสเต็ปทรู; จักรยานสามล้อ; อื่นๆ
en: Bicycle frame design: Diamond; Fatbike; Folding; Longtail cargo; Step-through; Tricycle; Other
fi: Polkupyörän rungon suunnittelu: Timanttirunko; Fatbike; Taitettava; Longtail-tavarapyörä; Matala jalannousu; Kolmipyörä; Muu
tr: Bisiklet kadrosu tasarımı: Elmas; Fatbike; Katlanır; Uzun kuyruklu kargo; Açık kadro; Üç tekerlekli bisiklet; Diğer
el: Σχεδιασμός σκελετού ποδηλάτου: Διαμάντι; Fatbike; Σπαστό; Longtail cargo; Step-through; Τρίκυκλο; Άλλο
es: Diseño del cuadro de la bicicleta: Diamante; Fatbike; Plegable; De carga longtail; Paso bajo; Triciclo; Otro
ro-RO: Designul cadrului bicicletei: Diamant; Fatbike; Pliabil; Cargo tip longtail; Step-through; Tricicletă; Altele
cs: Konstrukce rámu jízdního kola: Diamantový; Fatbike; Skládací; Nákladní Longtail; S nízkým nástupem; Tříkolka; Jiné
sk-SK: Dizajn rámu bicykla: Diamantový; Fatbike; Skladací; Nákladný Longtail; S nízkym nástupom; Trojkolka; Iné
zh-TW: 自行車架設計: 鑽石型; 胖胎車; 摺疊型; 長尾載貨型; 低跨點型; 三輪車; 其他
nl: Fiets frame ontwerp: Diamant; Fatbike; Vouwfiets; Longtail-bakfiets; Lage instap; Driewieler; Overig
nb: Sykkelens rammedesign: Diamant; Fatbike; Sammenleggbar; Longtail-lastesykkel; Lavt innsteg; Trehjulssykkel; Annet
pt-PT: Design do quadro de bicicleta: Diamante; Fatbike; Dobrável; Carga longtail; Aberto; Triciclo; Outro
sl-SI: Zasnova okvirja kolesa: Diamantni; Fatbike; Zložljivo; Tovorno (longtail); Z nizkim vstopom; Tricikel; Drugo
ja: 自転車Frameデザイン: ダイヤモンド; ファットバイク; 折りたたみ; ロングテールカーゴ; ステップスルー; トライク; その他
sv: Ramdesign: Diamantram; Fatbike; Hopfällbar; Longtail (lastcykel); Lågt insteg; Trehjuling; Övrigt
zh-CN: 自行车车架设计: 菱形; 胖胎车; 折叠; 长尾载货车; 低跨步式; 三轮车; 其他
bg-BG: Дизайн на рамката на велосипеда: Диамант (стандартна); Фетбайк; Сгъваема; Карго с дълга опашка; С ниска рамка; Триколка; Друго
hu: Kerékpárváz kialakítása: Gyémánt; Fatbike; Összecsukható; Longtail teherhordó; Alacsony átlépésű; Tricikli; Egyéb
hr-HR: Dizajn okvira bicikla: Dijamant; Fatbike; Sklopivi; Longtail teretni; Okvir bez gornje cijevi; Tricikl; Ostalo
fr: Conception du cadre de vélo: Diamant; Fatbike; Pliant; Cargo rallongé; À enjambement bas; Tricycle; Autre
ru: Конструкция велосипедной рамы: Ромбовидная; Фэтбайк; Складная; Грузовой лонгтейл; Открытая (заниженная); Трехколесный; Другое
ko: 자전거 프레임 디자인: 다이아몬드; 팻바이크; 접이식; 롱테일 카고; 스텝스루; 세발자전거; 기타
da: Cykelstellets udformning: Diamant; Fatbike; Foldbar; Longtail-ladcykel; Lav indstigning; Trehjulet cykel; Andet
de: Design des Fahrradrahmens: Diamant; Fatbike; Faltrad; Longtail-Lastenrad; Tiefeinsteiger; Dreirad; Sonstige
vi: Thiết kế khung xe đạp: Kim cương; Bánh béo (Fatbike); Gấp; Chở hàng đuôi dài; Khung thấp; Xe ba bánh; Khác
pl: Konstrukcja ramy rowerowej: Trójkątna (Diament); Fatbike; Składana; Longtail cargo; Z obniżonym przekrokiem; Trójkołowiec; Inne
pt-BR: Design do quadro da bicicleta: Diamante; Fatbike; Dobrável; Cargueira (longtail); Rebaixado (step-through); Triciclo; Outros